Hawaii statutes.
§606-4 Custody; disposition of exhibits.
(a) The clerks of the supreme court, intermediate appellate court, circuit
courts, and district courts shall have the custody of all records, books,
papers, moneys, exhibits, and other things pertaining to their respective
courts.

(b) The attorney of the party who introduced
the exhibits or things in evidence or left them in the custody of the court, or
the party, if not represented by any attorney, shall remove them from the court
within six months after the final termination of the action to which the
exhibits or things are related. The clerks shall have the authority and power,
upon the written approval of a judge of the court given in particular actions
or proceedings, to sell, destroy, or otherwise dispose of exhibits and things
marked for identification, other than original files belonging to other
actions, which have come into their possession or custody under this section,
when those exhibits or things have not been already removed by their owners or
by the attorneys representing the owners and when more than six months has
elapsed since the final termination of the action to which the exhibits or
things are related.

(c) All moneys received from sales under this
section shall be deposited with the director of finance as government
realizations. [L 1892, c 57, §63; am L 1911, c 84, §3; RL 1925, §2294; am L
1929, c 171, §1; RL 1935, §3693; RL 1945, §9724; RL 1955, §218-4; am L Sp 1959
2d, c 1, §14; am L 1963, c 114, §1; HRS §606-4; am L 1970, c 188, §26; am L
1972, c 88, §4(d); am L 1979, c 111, §4(2); am L 1984, c 259, §1; am L 2016, c
55, §20]

Case Notes

Proceeds of partition sale in hands of clerk and subject to
judicial action not subject to garnishment. 10 H. 499 (1896).

Previous
Vol13_Ch0601-0676
Next